Georgia, session 2025_26, HB226.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act to provide a new charter for the City of Cochran, approved April 11, 2012
(Ga. L. 2012, p. 5162), as amended, is amended by adding a new subsection to Section 1.11
to read as follows:
"(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this charter to the contrary, the corporate
limits of the City of Cochran shall include the following described property:
The right of way of State Route 23, also known as U.S. Highway 87, northward from the
corporate limits of the city on the effective date of this Act to the intersection of such
state route with Jac Arts Road."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 226
- 1 -